Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-815
Utilities district; powers and duties exclusive.

Nothing in sections 14-101 to 14-138, 14-201 to 14-229, 14-360 to 14-376, 14-501 to 14-556, 14-601 to 14-609, 14-702, 14-704, and 14-804 to 14-816 shall be construed so as to interfere with the powers, duties, authority, and privileges that are conferred and imposed upon the metropolitan utilities district as prescribed by law, but all matters relating to the powers, duties, authority, and privileges of such metropolitan utilities district so far as elsewhere conferred, imposed, and defined by law shall be exclusive and paramount.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 14 1/2, p. 513;

C.S.1922, § 3723;

C.S.1929, § 14-815;

R.S.1943, § 14-815;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 62.

The Metropolitan Utilities District has exclusive authority over the routine inspection of gas furnaces, and this authority is not shared with the City of Omaha. McNally v. City of Omaha, 273 Neb. 558, 731 N.W.2d 573 (2007).